New York, session 2025-2026, A418.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 130-a of the cannabis law, as added by a chapter of 2 the laws of 2024 amending the cannabis law relating to authorizing a 3 cannabis showcase event permit, as proposed in legislative bills numbers 4 S. 9679-A and A. 10398-A, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 130-a. Cannabis showcase event permit. 1. When used in this 6 section[, "cannabis]: 7 (a) "Cannabis showcase event" shall mean an event where[:] a licensee 8 authorized to conduct retail sales of adult-use cannabis, cannabis 9 products, and cannabis merchandise engages in the sale and showcase of 10 such products away from the licensed premises in [demonstrated] partner- 11 ship with [a] at minimum one licensed New York state adult-use cannabis 12 cultivator [or] and at minimum one licensed New York state adult-use 13 cannabis processor, at showcase events that are located at stand-alone 14 cannabis sale "pop-up" events, farmers' markets and public markets as 15 defined in section two hundred sixty of the agriculture and markets law 16 or similar such locations, as authorized by the office. 17 (b) "Showcase" shall mean the exhibiting or displaying at a cannabis 18 showcase event by a permittee or an authorized licensee of adult-use 19 cannabis and cannabis products and may include branded merchandise and 20 educational materials. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02891-01-5 A. 418 2 1 2. A licensee authorized under this chapter to conduct retail sales of 2 adult-use cannabis may apply to the office for a cannabis showcase event 3 permit and shall be required to demonstrate that they are in partnership 4 with a licensed cultivator [or] and a licensed processor pursuant to 5 subdivision one of this section. An application for a cannabis showcase 6 event permit shall identify [licensees] such licensed cultivators and 7 processors who are authorized under this chapter to showcase at such 8 cannabis showcase event. 9 3. A cannabis showcase event permit shall authorize: (a) the permitted 10 licensee, authorized under this chapter to conduct retail sales of 11 adult-use cannabis, adult-use cannabis products, and cannabis merchan- 12 dise, and (b) the permitted licensee[,] and licensees who are authorized 13 under this chapter to cultivate [and] or process adult-use cannabis, to 14 showcase their adult-use cannabis and cannabis products, for a tempo- 15 rary period of time, at a cannabis showcase event. The permittee shall 16 offer for sale the adult-use cannabis and adult-use cannabis products 17 cultivated or processed by the licensees authorized on the permit to 18 showcase at such cannabis showcase event, provided, however, the permit- 19 tee shall not be limited to selling the products of such authorized 20 licensees. 21 4. All adult-use cannabis and cannabis product sales at a cannabis 22 showcase event shall be executed by the permittee. No other licensee, 23 person or entity shall be authorized to engage in cannabis or cannabis 24 product sales at a cannabis showcase event. 25 5. A separate cannabis showcase event permit shall be required for 26 each showcase event at which a cannabis showcase event is being held. 27 [5.] 6. A separate cannabis showcase event permit shall be required 28 for each licensee authorized under this chapter to conduct retail sales 29 of adult-use cannabis and cannabis products. 30 7. In the event a cannabis showcase event contains more than one 31 permittee, each permittee shall nevertheless be required to partner with 32 at minimum one cultivator, pursuant to subdivision two of this section. 33 8. Each permittee shall be limited to partnering with no more than one 34 licensed processor for each licensed cultivator authorized on their 35 cannabis showcase event permit application. 36 9. No cannabis showcase event permit shall authorize more than one 37 cannabis showcase event at one time. A licensee may participate in more 38 than one cannabis showcase event so long as each cannabis showcase event 39 has a corresponding separate cannabis showcase event permit. 40 [6.] 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a canna- 41 bis showcase event permit shall be valid for no more than fourteen days. 42 [7.] 11. The board may set reasonable fees for cannabis showcase event 43 permits. Such fees may be based on [the type of] cannabis showcase event 44 permit [sought,] size, length, duration, or any other factors deemed 45 reasonable and appropriate by the board to achieve the policy and 46 purpose of this chapter. 47 [8.] 12. Permitted licensees shall comply with all reporting require- 48 ments, including required sales reporting, and all other requirements 49 set forth in regulations[, and any]. Any noncompliance by such permitted 50 licensees or licensees authorized on the permit to showcase shall 51 subject such [permitted] licensees to applicable fees, fines and penal- 52 ties. 53 [9.] 13. The board shall promulgate regulations to implement this 54 section. 55 § 2. Section 2 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the cannabis 56 law relating to authorizing a cannabis showcase event permit, as A. 418 3 1 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 9679-A and A. 10398-A, is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 § 2. This act shall take effect [immediately] on the one hundred twen- 4 tieth day after it shall have become a law. Effective immediately, the 5 addition, amendment, and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary 6 for the implementation of this act on its effective date are authorized 7 to be made and completed on or before such date. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 9 section one of this act shall take effect on the same date and in the 10 same manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the cannabis law 11 relating to authorizing a cannabis showcase event permit, as proposed in 12 legislative bills numbers S. 9679-A and A. 10398-A, takes effect.